Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 22-29-116.
Procedures for mail ballot elections.

Mail ballot elections shall be overseen by the county clerk as provided in W.S. 22-29-113(m). Official ballots shall be prepared and all other preelection procedures followed as otherwise provided by law or rules promulgated by the secretary of state, except that mail ballot packets shall be prepared in accordance with the following:

No later than forty-five (45) days prior to election day, the secretary of the special district shall request from the county clerk of each county in which the special district is located a list of qualified electors residing within the affected district;

No later than thirty (30) days prior to election day, the county clerk of each county in which a special district is located shall certify and submit to the election official a list of qualified electors residing within the affected district;

No sooner than twenty-five (25) days and no later than fifteen (15) days before an election, the election official shall mail to each landowner who has filed a written authorization and request for a mail ballot and to each qualified elector entitled to vote in the mail ballot election, at the last address appearing in the registration records a mail ballot packet, which shall be marked “DO NOT FORWARD-ADDRESS CORRECTION REQUESTED,” or any other similar statement which is in accordance with United States postal service regulations;

The ballot shall contain the following warning:

WARNING

The criminal laws regulating the conduct of elections contained in chapter 26 of the Wyoming Election Code of 1973, as amended apply with equal force to elections conducted by mail.

No sooner than twenty-five (25) days and no later than 4:00 p.m. on election day, mail ballots shall be made available at the election official’s office for voters entitled to vote in the election but who are not otherwise listed on the county voter registration records if otherwise authorized to vote;

A voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or for some other reason not received by the voter. In order to obtain a replacement ballot, the voter must sign a sworn statement specifying the reason for requesting the replacement ballot. The statement shall be presented to the election official no later than 4:00 p.m. on election day. The election official shall keep a record of each replacement ballot issued in accordance with this section together with a list of each ballot obtained pursuant to this section. An election official shall not transmit a mail ballot package under this section unless the application for the replacement ballot is received on or before election day. A replacement ballot may be transmitted directly to the applicant at the election official’s office or may be mailed to the voter at the address provided in the application. Replacement ballots may be cast no later than 5:00 p.m. on election day;

Upon receipt of a ballot, the voter shall mark the ballot, sign and complete the return-verification envelope, and comply with the instructions provided with the ballot. The voter may return the marked ballot to the election official by United States mail or by depositing the ballot at the office of the official or any place designated by the official. The ballot must be returned in the return-verification envelope. The ballot shall be received at the office of the election official or the designated depository no later than 5:00 p.m. on election day;

Once the ballot is returned, an election official shall first qualify the submitted ballot by examining the verification envelope and comparing the information on the envelope to the poll list to determine whether the ballot was submitted by a voter who has not previously voted in the election. If the ballot so qualifies, and is otherwise valid, the official shall enter the name of the registered voter in the poll book, open the return-verification envelope and deposit the ballot in an official ballot box;

All deposited ballots shall be counted as provided in this act and by rules promulgated by the secretary of state. A mail ballot shall be valid and counted only if it is returned in the return-verification envelope, the affidavit on the envelope is signed and completed by the voter to whom the ballot was issued and the information on the envelope is verified in accordance with paragraph (viii) of this subsection. If the election official determines that a voter to whom a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the official shall not count any ballot cast by that voter.

The election official responsible for conducting the election shall provide a minimum of one (1) polling place on the day of election which may be the election official’s office or the county clerk’s office and shall be open for not less than five (5) consecutive hours at any time between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m. as set forth in the notice of election.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-29-115

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; ch. 115, § 3; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2009, ch. 126, § 1; 2010, ch. 16, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(v) substituted “registration records” for “registration records or the registration list.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “may be the election official's office or the county clerk's office and” in (b).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the first sentence in the introductory language of (a).

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “or ballot label” in the introductory paragraph of (a)(iv).

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(viii) substituted “envelope and deposit” for “envelope, remove the ballot stub, and deposit.”

§ 22-29-117.
Change of district name.

A district may change its name from the name given it in the formation order of the county commissioners, or from the name under which it was otherwise organized, to a name chosen by resolution of a majority of the directors.

The directors shall not adopt a resolution for a district name change without publishing notice once of the proposed name change in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

All powers, rights, duties and obligations of a district which has adopted a new name shall be continued under the new name. All references to the prior name of the district shall be considered references to the new name.

A district changing its name shall immediately notify the secretary of state if the principal act requires that formation documents be filed with the secretary of state, the county treasurer, the county clerk and the county assessor of each county in which the district is situated.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977 §

22-29-116

; Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 3.

§ 22-29-118.
Directors; oath of office.

All directors, whether elected or appointed, shall, within ten (10) business days after notification of election or appointment, take the oath of office provided in Wyoming constitution, article VI, section 20, before an officer authorized to administer oaths. The director shall also complete the written oath and without delay transmit a copy of the oath in writing to the respective county clerks for the first election and to the secretary of the district thereafter.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-29-117

; Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 3; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, substituted “ten (10) business days” for “ten (10) days.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 22-29-102(a)(iii).

§ 22-29-119.
District officers; meeting of board; conflict of interest.

Each year the board of directors shall as soon as they are qualified elect a president, treasurer and secretary of the district. The board of directors shall hold regular and may hold special meetings as they determine. No trustee shall be directly interested financially in any contract, work done or property purchased by the district unless he has made full public disclosure and the board has unanimously approved his financial interest. A majority of directors constitutes a quorum for the transaction of district business.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 1.